South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 2, Chapter 26, Title 34 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 34-26-290. A credit union shall post in a conspicuous place in its place of business and on its website, app, or any other electronic format utilized, all fees and charges that may be assessed against a member. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----